Vermont, session 2025-2026, H56.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. chapter 80 is added to read:
CHAPTER 80. ESSENTIAL MEDICATION STOCKPILE FOR
REPRODUCTIVE AND GENDER-AFFIRMING CARE
VT LEG #379406 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.56
2025 Page 2 of 4
§ 3851. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Essential medications for reproductive and gender-affirming care”
means medications needed for reproductive health care services and
medications needed for gender-affirming health care services, including
puberty blockers, hormone therapies, medications for termination of a
pregnancy, and contraceptive medications.
(2) “Gender-affirming health care services” has the same meaning as in
1 V.S.A. § 150.
(3) “Health care facility” has the same meaning as in section 9402 of
this title.
(4) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as in section 9402 of
this title.
(5) “Reproductive health care services” has the same meaning as in 1
V.S.A. § 150.
§ 3852. STOCKPILE OF ESSENTIAL MEDICATIONS FOR
REPRODUCTIVE AND GENDER-AFFIRMING CARE
(a) The Department of Health shall assess, purchase, and maintain an
emergency supply of essential medications for reproductive and gender-
affirming care to ensure the ongoing availability of these medications to
individuals in Vermont. The Department may contract or enter into
VT LEG #379406 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.56
2025 Page 3 of 4
agreements with health care providers, health care facilities, and other
qualified entities as needed to establish and administer the emergency supply.
(b) The Department of Health shall adopt rules in accordance with 3 V.S.A.
chapter 25 for the administration of the emergency supply, including rules
regarding:
(1) the specific essential medications for reproductive and gender-
affirming care to be stockpiled;
(2) the procurement, storage, management, and distribution of the
medications, including strategic placement of the medications across the State
to ensure equitable access, with priority for underserved and rural
communities; and
(3) protocols for inventory rotation to minimize waste and ensure
regulatory compliance.
§ 3853. REPORTING REQUIREMENT
On or before January 15 of each year, the Department of Health shall report
to the General Assembly on the status of the emergency supply of essential
medications for reproductive and gender-affirming care, including the average
number of doses on hand for each category of medication during the previous
calendar year, utilization of each category of medication during the previous
calendar year, and the outlook for supply and demand during the forthcoming
calendar year.
VT LEG #379406 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.56
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 2. INITIAL RULEMAKING; EMERGENCY RULES
The potential for limitations on access to essential medications for
reproductive and gender-affirming care is deemed to constitute an imminent
peril to public health, safety, or welfare in satisfaction of the criteria set forth
in 3 V.S.A. § 844. In addition to the rulemaking required under 18 V.S.A.
§ 3852(b), as enacted by Sec. 1 of this act, the Department of Health shall
adopt emergency rules in accordance with 3 V.S.A. § 844 on or before
September 1, 2025 to establish and maintain the emergency supply of those
essential medications.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379406 v.1